Florida, session 2026, SB922.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 26 27 Section 1.âSubsection (30) is added to section 409.906, 28 Florida Statutes, to read: 29 409.906âOptional Medicaid services.âSubject to specific 30 appropriations, the agency may make payments for services which 31 are optional to the state under Title XIX of the Social Security 32 Act and are furnished by Medicaid providers to recipients who 33 are determined to be eligible on the dates on which the services 34 were provided. Any optional service that is provided shall be 35 provided only when medically necessary and in accordance with 36 state and federal law. Optional services rendered by providers 37 in mobile units to Medicaid recipients may be restricted or 38 prohibited by the agency. Nothing in this section shall be 39 construed to prevent or limit the agency from adjusting fees, 40 reimbursement rates, lengths of stay, number of visits, or 41 number of services, or making any other adjustments necessary to 42 comply with the availability of moneys and any limitations or 43 directions provided for in the General Appropriations Act or 44 chapter 216. If necessary to safeguard the stateâs systems of 45 providing services to elderly and disabled persons and subject 46 to the notice and review provisions of s. 216.177, the Governor 47 may direct the Agency for Health Care Administration to amend 48 the Medicaid state plan to delete the optional Medicaid service 49 known as âIntermediate Care Facilities for the Developmentally 50 Disabled.â Optional services may include: 51 (30)âHABILITATIVE AND REHABILITATIVE SERVICES AND DEVICES 52 FOR TREATMENT OF STUTTERING.â 53 (a)âThe agency may pay for the following services and 54 devices as a treatment of stuttering for a recipient: 55 1.âHabilitative services and devices, including 56 habilitative speech therapy, regardless of whether the 57 stuttering is classified as developmental. 58 2.âRehabilitative services and devices, including 59 rehabilitative speech therapy. 60 3.âBoth habilitative services and devices and 61 rehabilitative services and devices as provided in subparagraphs 62 1. and 2., respectively. 63 (b)1.âThe coverage for habilitative services and devices 64 and rehabilitative services and devices provided under paragraph 65 (a) is not subject to any limit: 66 a.âOn the number of visits a recipient may make to a 67 speech-language pathologist; or 68 b.âBased on the type of disease, injury, disorder, or other 69 medical condition that resulted in the stuttering. 70 2.âThe habilitative speech therapy and rehabilitative 71 speech therapy provided under paragraph (a) may be rendered in 72 person or via telehealth. For reimbursement for speech therapy 73 rendered via telehealth, the agency may also include the use of 74 any communication technology, application, or platform to 75 deliver telehealth services which complies with applicable 76 privacy provisions of the Health Insurance Portability and 77 Accountability Act of 1996, 42 U.S.C. ss. 1320d et seq., as 78 amended. 79 (c)âAs used in this subsection, the term: 80 1.ââHabilitative services and devicesâ means health care 81 services and assistive technology devices that help a person 82 learn, maintain, or improve skills and functioning for daily 83 living. 84 2.ââHabilitative speech therapyâ means speech therapy that 85 helps a person learn, maintain, or improve skills and 86 functioning for daily living. 87 3.ââRehabilitative services and devicesâ means restorative 88 and remedial services and assistive technology devices that 89 maintain or enhance the current level of functioning of a person 90 if there is a possibility of improvement or reversal of 91 impairment. 92 4.ââRehabilitative speech therapyâ means restorative and 93 remedial speech therapy that maintains or enhances the current 94 level of functioning of a person if there is a possibility of 95 improvement or reversal of impairment. 96 (d)âThe agency may seek federal approval necessary to 97 implement this subsection. 98 Section 2.âSection 627.64192, Florida Statutes, is created 99 to read: 100 627.64192âCoverage for treatment of stuttering.â 101 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 102 (a)ââHabilitative services and devicesâ means health care 103 services and assistive technology devices that help a person 104 learn, maintain, or improve skills and functioning for daily 105 living. 106 (b)ââHabilitative speech therapyâ means speech therapy that 107 helps a person learn, maintain, or improve skills and 108 functioning for daily living. 109 (c)ââRehabilitative services and devicesâ means restorative 110 and remedial services and assistive technology devices that 111 maintain or enhance the current level of functioning of a person 112 if there is a possibility of improvement or reversal of 113 impairment. 114 (d)ââRehabilitative speech therapyâ means restorative and 115 remedial speech therapy that maintains or enhances the current 116 level of functioning of a person if there is a possibility of 117 improvement or reversal of impairment. 118 (2)(a)âA health insurance policy that provides coverage 119 for: 120 1.âHabilitative services and devices must provide coverage 121 for habilitative services and devices as a treatment for 122 stuttering, including habilitative speech therapy, regardless of 123 whether the stuttering is classified as developmental. 124 2.âRehabilitative services and devices must provide 125 coverage for rehabilitative services and devices as a treatment 126 for stuttering, including rehabilitative speech therapy. 127 3.âBoth habilitative services and devices and 128 rehabilitative services and devices must provide the coverages 129 required under subparagraphs 1. and 2. 130 (b)âThe coverage for habilitative services and devices and 131 rehabilitative services and devices required under paragraph 132 (a): 133 1.âMay not be subject to: 134 a.âAny limit on maximum annual benefits, including any 135 limit on the number of visits an insured may make to a speech 136 language pathologist; 137 b.âAny limit based on the type of disease, injury, 138 disorder, or other medical condition that resulted in the 139 stuttering; or 140 c.âAny utilization review or utilization management 141 requirement, including prior authorization or a determination 142 that the habilitative services and devices or rehabilitative 143 services and devices are medically necessary. 144 2.âMust include coverage for speech therapy provided in 145 person and via telehealth. The telehealth coverage provided 146 under this paragraph: 147 a.âMay not be less than the coverage for in-person speech 148 therapy. 149 b.âMust include the use of any communication technology, 150 application, or platform to deliver telehealth services which 151 complies with applicable privacy provisions of the Health 152 Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, 42 U.S.C. 153 ss. 1320d et seq., as amended. 154 Section 3.âSection 627.66912, Florida Statutes, is created 155 to read: 156 627.66912âCoverage for treatment of stuttering.â 157 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 158 (a)ââHabilitative services and devicesâ means health care 159 services and assistive technology devices that help a person 160 learn, maintain, or improve skills and functioning for daily 161 living. 162 (b)ââHabilitative speech therapyâ means speech therapy that 163 helps a person learn, maintain, or improve skills and 164 functioning for daily living. 165 (c)ââRehabilitative services and devicesâ means restorative 166 and remedial services and assistive technology devices that 167 maintain or enhance the current level of functioning of a person 168 if there is a possibility of improvement or reversal of 169 impairment. 170 (d)ââRehabilitative speech therapyâ means restorative and 171 remedial speech therapy that maintains or enhances the current 172 level of functioning of a person if there is a possibility of 173 improvement or reversal of impairment. 174 (2)(a)âA health insurance policy that provides coverage 175 for: 176 1.âHabilitative services and devices must provide coverage 177 for habilitative services and devices as a treatment for 178 stuttering, including habilitative speech therapy, regardless of 179 whether the stuttering is classified as developmental. 180 2.âRehabilitative services and devices must provide 181 coverage for rehabilitative services and devices as a treatment 182 for stuttering, including rehabilitative speech therapy. 183 3.âBoth habilitative services and devices and 184 rehabilitative services and devices must provide the coverages 185 required under subparagraphs 1. and 2. 186 (b)âThe coverage for habilitative services and devices and 187 rehabilitative services and devices required under paragraph 188 (a): 189 1.âMay not be subject to: 190 a.âAny limit on maximum annual benefits, including any 191 limit on the number of visits an insured may make to a speech 192 language pathologist; 193 b.âAny limit based on the type of disease, injury, 194 disorder, or other medical condition that resulted in the 195 stuttering; or 196 c.âAny utilization review or utilization management 197 requirement, including prior authorization or a determination 198 that the habilitative services and devices or rehabilitative 199 services and devices are medically necessary. 200 2.âMust include coverage for speech therapy provided in 201 person and via telehealth. The telehealth coverage provided 202 under this paragraph: 203 a.âMay not be less than the coverage for in-person speech 204 therapy. 205 b.âMust include the use of any communication technology, 206 application, or platform to deliver telehealth services which 207 complies with applicable privacy provisions of the Health 208 Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, 42 U.S.C. 209 ss. 1320d et seq., as amended. 210 Section 4.âSection 641.3109, Florida Statutes, is created 211 to read: 212 641.3109âCoverage for treatment of stuttering.â 213 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 214 (a)ââHabilitative services and devicesâ means health care 215 services and assistive technology devices that help a person 216 learn, maintain, or improve skills and functioning for daily 217 living. 218 (b)ââHabilitative speech therapyâ means speech therapy that 219 helps a person learn, maintain, or improve skills and 220 functioning for daily living. 221 (c)ââRehabilitative services and devicesâ means restorative 222 and remedial services and assistive technology devices that 223 maintain or enhance the current level of functioning of a person 224 if there is a possibility of improvement or reversal of 225 impairment. 226 (d)ââRehabilitative speech therapyâ means restorative and 227 remedial speech therapy that maintains or enhances the current 228 level of functioning of a person if there is a possibility of 229 improvement or reversal of impairment. 230 (2)(a)âA health maintenance contract that provides coverage 231 for: 232 1.âHabilitative services and devices must provide coverage 233 for habilitative services and devices as a treatment for 234 stuttering, including habilitative speech therapy, regardless of 235 whether the stuttering is classified as developmental. 236 2.âRehabilitative services and devices must provide 237 coverage for rehabilitative services and devices as a treatment 238 for stuttering, including rehabilitative speech therapy. 239 3.âBoth habilitative services and devices and 240 rehabilitative services and devices must provide the coverages 241 required under subparagraphs 1. and 2. 242 (b)âThe coverage for habilitative services and devices and 243 rehabilitative services and devices required under paragraph 244 (a): 245 1.âMay not be subject to: 246 a.âAny limit on maximum annual benefits, including any 247 limit on the number of visits a subscriber may make to a speech 248 language pathologist; 249 b.âAny limit based on the type of disease, injury, 250 disorder, or other medical condition that resulted in the 251 stuttering; or 252 c.âAny utilization review or utilization management 253 requirement, including prior authorization or a determination 254 that the habilitative services and devices or rehabilitative 255 services and devices are medically necessary. 256 2.âMust include coverage for speech therapy provided in 257 person and via telehealth. The telehealth coverage provided 258 under this paragraph: 259 a.âMay not be less than the coverage for in-person speech 260 therapy. 261 b.âMust include the use of any communication technology, 262 application, or platform to deliver telehealth services which 263 complies with applicable privacy provisions of the Health 264 Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, 42 U.S.C. 265 ss. 1320d et seq., as amended. 266 Section 5.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.